West Virginia, session 2025, HB2393.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 17A. Mountaineer Trail Network Recreation Authority. §20-17A-6. Reporting. (a) There shall be an annual report made from the Mountaineer Trail Network Authority to the Joint Committee on Government and Finance concerning:(1) Progress made towards the goals laid out in §20-17-1 et seq. and §20-17A-1 et seq. of this code;(2) A report of grants requested and received; and(3) Progress made on other projects within the Trail Networks throughout the state.(b) This reporting shall begin on December 1, 2025. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home